Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1305.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE VII-AOFFICE OF CHILD ADVOCATESection 701-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child Advocate." The Child Advocate appointed under section 702-A."Child health, safety and well-being program." A service or 123456789101112131415161718 program designed to:(1) Prevent neglect, abuse and exploitation of children and encourage reporting of suspected child abuse under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services).(2) Provide temporary, substitute care in foster family homes or residential child care facilities for a child in need of the care under Article VII and 67 Pa.C.S. Chs. 75 (relating to family finding and kinship care) and 77 (relating to adoption opportunities).(3) Provide court-ordered care or supervision to alleged or adjudicated dependent or delinquent children under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters).(4) Provide early intervention under the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1372, No.212), known as the Early Intervention Services System Act.(5) Provide education for alleged or adjudicated dependent or delinquent children under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 who are placed in or are transitioning from residential settings."County agency." The county children and youth social service agency exercising the powers and duties provided for under section 405 of the act of June 24, 1937 (P.L.2017, No.396), known as the County Institution District Law, and supervised by the department under Article IX."Executive agency." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 102 of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act."Executive board." The Executive Board of the Commonwealth established under section 204 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929."Facility." A residential facility for children operated or 20250HB1305PN1499 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensed by the department under Articles IX and X."Local government." A county, county institution district, city, borough, incorporated town, township or any similar, general or limited purpose unit of local government or unit created by joint action of two or more local government units authorized to be created by law."Office." The Office of Child Advocate established under section 702-A.Section 702-A. Office of Child Advocate.(a) Establishment.--The Office of Child Advocate is established within the department to independently and impartially advocate for and advance the interests of children. The office shall operate under the direction of the Child Advocate. The office shall function independently of the department regarding the office's decision-making functions, including the powers and duties specified under this article.(b) Appointment and qualifications.--(1) The Child Advocate shall be appointed by the Governor , with the advice and consent of the Senate, and shall hold office for a term of four years and until a successor is duly appointed, but may not serve more than 90 days beyond the expiration of the appointed term.(2) A vacancy occurring by expiration of term, death, resignation, removal or for any other reasons shall be filled in the manner provided by section 8(b) of Article IV of the Constitution of Pennsylvania for the remainder of the term. The Child Advocate may only be removed from office for good cause shown.(3) When the term of the Child Advocate expires, the position shall be immediately deemed a vacancy and the 20250HB1305PN1499 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Governor shall nominate a person to fill that position within 90 days of the date of expiration, even if the Child Advocate continues in office.(4) The Child Advocate may be reappointed for additional terms.(5) The Child Advocate shall be an individual who, by reason of training and experience, is qualified to advocate for and advance the interests of children. (6) To be eligible to be appointed by the Governor as Child Advocate, an individual shall have no known conflict of interest with the department or a county agency and at least six years of professional experience in child advocacy, social work, direct care service to children or related areas, including one year in a supervisory or administrative capacity , and a bachelor's degree. Any equivalent combination of experience and training shall be acceptable.(c) Compensation.--Compensation for the Child Advocate shall be set by the executive board.(d) Training.--Within six months of appointment, the Child Advocate and employees of the office shall complete training, at a minimum, in the following areas:(1) Crisis intervention and behavior management.(2) Trauma-informed care.(3) Sensitive and confidential information.(4) Mandated reporter training.(5) Compliance with the provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936).(e) Mandated reporter.--The Child Advocate and the staff of the office are mandated reporters under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 20250HB1305PN1499 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to child protective services) and shall make a report of suspected child abuse in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. § 6311 (relating to persons required to report suspected child abuse).(f) Clearance.--The Child Advocate and the staff of the office shall obtain clearance certifications in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344 (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents) as a person responsible for the child's welfare or having direct contact with children. The clearance certifications shall be submitted to the department as follows:(1) By the Child Advocate prior to taking office.(2) By staff of the office prior to commencement of employment.(g) Restricted activities .--The Child Advocate may not seek election nor accept appointment to a political office during tenure as the Child Advocate and for one year thereafter.(h) Facilities and staff.--(1) Upon request of the Child Advocate, the department shall make available facilities, administrative support and other clerical, technical and professional staff as may be available within the budget of the department. Positions of the office shall be placed under the unclassified service provisions of 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. III (relating to civil service reform).(2) Legal counsel for the office shall be appointed in accordance with the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.Section 703-A. Powers and duties.The powers and duties of the office shall be as follows: (1) Advocate for and advance the interests of children 20250HB1305PN1499 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by supporting and enhancing child health, safety and well-being programs.(2) Serve as a resource to connect children and families with child health, safety and well-being programs.(3) Perform outreach to youth advocates and professional organizations involved with facility placements and access.(3.1) Consult with executive agencies, county agencies and individuals with lived experience on child health, safety and well-being programs.(4) Conduct visits to a facility as follows:(i) During a visit, the Child Advocate or the Child Advocate's authorized designee may conduct voluntary interviews of staff and residents of the facility.(ii) The office shall provide reasonable advance written notification to the department of a visit under this section.(iii) The Child Advocate shall provide written notification to the department of findings within 30 business days after the visit. (iv) The Child Advocate or authorized designee may not interview the following:(A) A resident or staff involved in a pending criminal investigation, prosecution and related appeal or an administrative licensure action and related appeal. This clause shall not apply to the Child Advocate's or authorized designee's support of a subject child under paragraph (11).(B) A resident or staff who are the subject of a report under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services) during a child abuse 20250HB1305PN1499 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation and related appeal. This clause shall not apply to the Child Advocate's or authorized designee's support of a subject child under paragraph (11).(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, participate as a member of all child fatality or near fatality review teams under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6365 (relating to services for prevention, investigation and treatment of child abuse). The Child Advocate may authorize a designee to participate in a child fatality or near fatality review team on the Child Advocate's behalf.(6) Coordinate educational, informational and other programs for public awareness and education concerning child maltreatment and the role of the community in supporting and strengthening families and keeping children safe.(7) Promote and advocate the health, safety and well-being of children before the General Assembly.(8) Receive and review complaints from the public, including receiving complaints from a child, relating to the processes or procedures of a child health, safety and well-being program. In the Child Advocate's sole discretion, the Child Advocate may make recommendations, referrals, or both, to the appropriate executive agency concerning a complaint.(9) Review and evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of the State and local complaint processes for child health, safety and well-being programs and to make recommendations for the improvement of these processes.(10) Request, access and review otherwise confidential information, records or documents necessary for carrying out the duties and responsibility under this article from an 20250HB1305PN1499 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 executive agency or local government in accordance with section 704-A(b). Access under this paragraph does not include access to criminal investigative or intelligence records.(11) As requested, to accompany a child who is a subject child under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 to interviews and administrative hearings.(12) Each quarter, send a report to each facility that was the subject of a complaint under paragraph (8) during the relevant period, listing the complaints involving that facility that were received during the past quarter.(13) Meet regularly with the secretary and other executive agency and county agency officials and report on any Statewide trends that the Child Advocate has identified with potential solutions.(14) In collaboration with applicable executive agencies, coordinate educational, informational and other programs for public awareness and education concerning child maltreatment and the role of the community in supporting and strengthening families and keeping children safe.(15) In collaboration with executive agencies and county agencies, children and families with experience in child health, safety and well-being programs and other interested stakeholders, review trends and promote best practices and effective child health, safety and well-being programs.(16) In collaboration with executive agencies, county agencies , children and families with experience in child health, safety and well-being programs and other interested stakeholders , provide recommendations regarding improvements for child health, safety and well-being programs.20250HB1305PN1499 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (17) Consult with executive agencies and provide recommendations on regulations, licensure, financing or any other responsibilities of the executive agencies to improve the safety of and promote better outcomes for children and families receiving services in child health, safety and well-being programs in the Commonwealth.(18) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, serve as a voting member of the Children's Trust Fund Board.(19) Collaborate with local government and executive agencies, including the Office of Victim Advocate, regarding the coordination of services to children who are victims of abuse.(19.1) Collaborate with local government and executive agencies, including State and local education agencies, regarding education issues relating to alleged or adjudicated dependent or delinquent children under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters) who are placed in or are transitioning from residential settings.(20) By June 30, 2025, and June 30 each year thereafter, provide an annual report summarizing the Child Advocate's activities and accomplishments to the Governor, the secretary, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Children and Youth Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives. The annual report shall be posted on the office's publicly accessible Internet website and may not include confidential 20250HB1305PN1499 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or personally identifiable information. The report shall include, at a minimum, the following:(i) A summary regarding the type of matters handled by the Child Advocate during the year.(ii) Recommendations regarding legislation to improve the safety of and promote better outcomes for children and families receiving services in child health, safety and well-being programs in this Commonwealth.(iii) A summary regarding quarterly reports of each facility that was the subject of a complaint received during the relevant period, listing the complaints involving that facility that were received during the past quarter.(iv) Any other information the office finds pertinent and beneficial.Section 704-A. Information, records and documents generally.(a) Relationship to department and county agency powers and duties.--The powers and duties of the Child Advocate under section 703-A do not supplant, supersede or otherwise affect the powers, duties and responsibilities of the department or a county agency. Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit the department, a county agency or the Child Advocate from working in collaboration with each other.(b) Access.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon request of the office, an executive agency or local government shall furnish information, records or documents under a child health, safety and welfare program to the Child Advocate or an authorized designee as follows:(1) An executive agency or local government shall furnish existing information, records or documents in the 20250HB1305PN1499 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 executive agency's or local government's possession, custody or control within 10 days of receiving a request. Nothing in this article shall be construed to require an executive agency or local government to create a record that does not currently exist or provide access to information, records or documents in a pending investigation.(2) Access to child protective services information, records and documents may be made available to the Child Advocate after the issuance of a final determination under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6368(f) (relating to investigation of reports) or the expiration of related litigation and the applicable pending appeal periods, whichever is later. After the expiration of this time period, the requested information, records or documents shall be furnished to the Child Advocate within 10 days of receiving the Child Advocate's request.(3) Access under this subsection does not include access to the identity of the person who makes a report of suspected child abuse, law enforcement records or records prohibited from disclosure under Federal law or court order.(c) Immunity.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person providing requested materials under subsection (b) may not be found, by reason of having provided the materials, to have violated any criminal law or to be civilly liable under any law, unless the materials are false and the person providing the materials knew or had reason to believe that the materials were false and was motivated by malice toward a person directly affected by the action.(d) Confidentiality.--(1) Confidential, privileged or protected information, records or documents provided to the Child Advocate under 20250HB1305PN1499 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b):(i) Shall remain confidential, privileged and protected.(ii) May not be discoverable or admissible as evidence in an action or proceeding.(iii) May not be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(2) Information, records or documents that would otherwise be available from original sources may not be construed as immune from discovery or use in an action or proceeding merely because they were presented to the Child Advocate.(3) The home address of the Child Advocate and employees of the office is not a public record under the Right-to-Know Law. The office's nonexempt financial records and aggregated data, as defined in section 102 of the Right-to-Know Law, shall remain subject to the Right-to-Know Law, provided that personally identifiable information shall be redacted . (e) Unauthorized access.--A person who divulges confidential information, records or documents received under this article to an unauthorized person commits a misdemeanor of the second degree. A person who violates the provisions of this section shall, in addition to other civil or criminal penalties provided by law, be denied access to the information, records or documents provided under this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1305PN1499 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627